Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-2950
Marketing contract.

(1) If a marketing contract provides for the sale of products, commodities, or goods to a limited cooperative association, the sale transfers title absolutely, except for security interests properly perfected, to the association upon delivery or at any other specific time expressly provided by the contract.

(2) A marketing contract may:

(a) Authorize a limited cooperative association to create an enforceable security interest in the products, commodities, or goods delivered; and

(b) Allow the limited cooperative association to sell the products, commodities, or goods delivered and pay the sales price on a pooled or other basis after deducting selling costs, processing costs, overhead, expenses, and other charges.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 50;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 11.